Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2941YC (1) 91 dg/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 1 LOW-INCOME HOME ENERGY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. 2 1. For purposes of this section, âelectric utilityâ means 3 any person, partnership, business association, or corporation, 4 domestic or foreign, owning or operating any facilities that, 5 for compensation, furnish electricity to the public in this 6 state. 7 2. a. The department of health and human services shall 8 amend the departmentâs rules pursuant to chapter 17A to allow 9 a household to be eligible for the low-income home energy 10 assistance program if the household is described by all of the 11 following: 12 (1) The householdâs gross income is equal to or less 13 than two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level 14 applicable to the family size of the household. 15 (2) The householdâs primary place of residence is located in 16 an electric utility service territory in which between July 1, 17 2023, and July 1, 2025, the electric utility increased the rate 18 for furnishing electricity. 19 (3) The household meets the non-income-based requirements 20 for the low-income home energy assistance program. 21 b. A householdâs eligibility for the low-income energy 22 assistance program under paragraph âaâ shall terminate four 23 years from the date an electric utility increased the rate for 24 furnishing electricity in the electric utility service area in 25 which the household is located. 26 3. a. The department of health and human services shall 27 assess a fee on all electric utilities in an amount necessary 28 to cover the increased cost of administering the low-income 29 home energy assistance program due to more households being 30 eligible for the program under subsection 2. 31 b. A nonprofit electric utility may assess a fee on all 32 ratepayers who are not participating in the low-income home 33 energy assistance program in an amount necessary to pay the 34 cost of the fee assessed by the department of health and human 35 -1- LSB 2941YC (1) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 H.F. _____ services on the nonprofit electric utility under paragraph âaâ, 1 but shall not assess such a fee on a ratepayer participating 2 in the program. 3 c. A for-profit electric utility shall not assess a fee 4 on any ratepayer to pay for the cost of the fee assessed by 5 the department of health and human services on the for-profit 6 electric utility under paragraph âaâ. 7